North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-08 Action for Spousal or Child Support

14-08-01.
Action against husband or wife for support of spouse and minor children — When maintained.

Any married person may maintain an action in the district court of the county in which the person resides against the person’s spouse for failure on the spouse’s part to provide for:

The support of the party bringing suit; and

The support of minor children by said husband or wife living with the party bringing suit.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 167, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 5923; R.C. 1899, § 5923; R.C. 1905, § 7541; C.L. 1913, § 8169; R.C. 1943, § 14-0801; S.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 24.

Cross-References.

Abandonment or nonsupport of child or wife a felony, see N.D.C.C. §§ 14-07-15, 14-07-16, 14-09-22.

14-08-02.
Power of court to render judgment.

If it appears to the court upon the trial of an action against a husband or wife to provide support for that person’s spouse and minor children that that person is able to support or contribute to the support of that person’s spouse and said children and that the person neglects or refuses to perform the person’s duty in that respect, the court may render such judgment as to the support by the person of that person’s spouse and said children as is equitable in view of the circumstances of both parties.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 167, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 5924; R.C. 1899, § 5924; R.C. 1905, § 7542; C.L. 1913, § 8170; R.C. 1943, § 14-0802; S.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 25.

14-08-03.
Procedure for action.

The practice in an action against a husband or wife to provide support for that person’s spouse and minor children must conform as nearly as may be to the practice in actions for divorce.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 167, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 5925; R.C. 1899, § 5925; R.C. 1905, § 7543; C.L. 1913, § 8171; R.C. 1943, § 14-0803; S.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 26.

14-08-04.
What payments made by spouse pending action.

The court in its discretion may require the defending spouse to pay any money necessary to enable the plaintiff to prosecute the action and to support the plaintiff and any children in the plaintiff’s custody during its pendency.

Source:

R.C. 1895, § 5926; R.C. 1899, § 5926; R.C. 1905, § 7544; C.L. 1913, § 8172; R.C. 1943, § 14-0804; S.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 27.

14-08-05.
Security required — Receiver.

The court may require the defendant in an action to give reasonable security for making any payments required under the provisions of this chapter and may enforce the same by the appointment of a receiver or by any remedy applicable to the case.

Source:

R.C. 1895, § 5927; R.C. 1899, § 5927; R.C. 1905, § 7545; C.L. 1913, § 8173; R.C. 1943, § 14-0805; S.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 28.

Collateral References.

Right to credit against child support arrearages for time child lived in custody of noncustodial parent, other than for visitation, where custodial parent’s approval was not in issue or was disputed by parties, 112 A.L.R.5th 185.

14-08-06.
Modifying or vacating judgment.

The judgment may be modified or vacated at any time upon the hearing of the parties.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 167, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 5928; R.C. 1899, § 5928; R.C. 1905, § 7546; C.L. 1913, § 8174; R.C. 1943, § 14-0806.

14-08-07.
Support payments — Payment to court — Transfer of payment to court of recipient’s residence — Transfer of proceedings for enforcement of decree — Procedures upon failure to pay. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 36.

14-08-08.
Notification and duties of county social service board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 36.

14-08-09.
Aid of court available to recipients of support. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 36.

14-08-10.
Remedies additional to those existing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 36.